Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 2. Administrative Enforcement Actions

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

11 Am. Jur. 2d Banks and Financial Institutions § 1220.

§ 13-10-201.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Bank holding company” means a bank holding company as defined in W.S.

13-1-101

which owns or controls a Wyoming financial institution;

“Critically undercapitalized” means the paid-in capital, retained earnings and undivided profits of the Wyoming financial institution are less than two percent (2%) of the total assets of the financial institution;

“Prompt corrective action” means any action the federal deposit insurance corporation is authorized to take with regard to a state chartered bank under 12 U.S.C. 1831o(d) through (i);

“Wyoming financial institution” means any bank, savings and loan association, special purpose depository institution or trust company chartered or organized under the laws of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 1; 2019 ch. 92, § 3, effective October 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective October 1, 2019, in (a)(iv), added “special purpose depository institution.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 13-10-202.
Informal enforcement actions; joint enforcement actions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner may enforce the provisions of this act by informal actions such as board resolutions, letter agreements, memoranda of understanding or supervisory agreements.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner may enter into an agreement and take action with the appropriate federal regulatory agency to enforce jointly all federal and state laws applicable to Wyoming financial institutions and bank holding companies.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

§ 13-10-203.
Cease and desist orders; Wyoming financial institutions; bank holding companies notice; opportunity for hearing.

After notice and opportunity for hearing, the commissioner shall issue a final cease and desist order to a Wyoming financial institution if the Wyoming financial institution or any officer, director, employee or agent of the institution is violating or is about to violate any state statute or rule relating to financial institutions or is engaging or is about to engage in an unauthorized or unsafe and unsound practice. After notice and opportunity for hearing, the commissioner shall issue a final cease and desist order to a bank holding company if the bank holding company or any officer, director, manager, employee or agent of the bank holding company is violating or is about to violate any state or federal statute or rule relating to bank holding companies or is engaging or is about to engage in an unauthorized or unsafe and unsound practice relating to Wyoming financial institutions owned or controlled by the bank holding company.

Before issuing a final cease and desist order, the commissioner shall serve notice of intent to issue the order upon the Wyoming financial institution or the bank holding company. The notice shall be in writing and shall contain the information required by W.S. 13-10-208(a). The proposed order shall direct the Wyoming financial institution or the bank holding company to discontinue the violations of law or the unsafe and unsound practices and may direct the Wyoming financial institution or the bank holding company to take any action the commissioner deems necessary to correct the alleged violation or wrongful practice.

The Wyoming financial institution or the bank holding company may request a hearing on the proposed order before the board in accordance with W.S. 13-10-208(b). If the Wyoming financial institution or the bank holding company does not request a hearing in writing within the prescribed time period, the proposed order shall become a final cease and desist order and the commissioner shall serve the final order upon the Wyoming financial institution or the bank holding company.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 1; 2001, ch. 73, § 1.

§ 13-10-204.
Temporary cease and desist order; Wyoming financial institutions; bank holding companies; service.

If the commissioner believes the actions of a Wyoming financial institution or of any officer, director, employee or agent of the institution pose an immediate threat to the safety and soundness of the financial institution or to the interests of the depositors, creditors or shareholders of the financial institution, he may issue a temporary cease and desist order to the financial institution pending final action on the proposed cease and desist order issued pursuant to W.S.

13-10-203

.

If the commissioner believes the actions of a bank holding company or of any officer, director, manager, employee or agent of the bank holding company pose an immediate threat to the safety and soundness of a Wyoming financial institution owned or controlled by the holding company or to the interests of the depositors, creditors or shareholders of the financial institution, the commissioner may issue a temporary cease and desist order to the bank holding company pending final action on the proposed cease and desist order issued pursuant to W.S.

13-10-203

.

The temporary order shall be in writing and shall be served upon the Wyoming financial institution or the bank holding company. The temporary order shall take effect upon service and shall remain in effect until the commissioner issues the final cease and desist order or the board dismisses the proposed cease and desist order after hearing.

On or after the effective date of the temporary order, the attorney general, upon request from the commissioner, may apply to the district court for the county in which the Wyoming financial institution is located for enforcement of the temporary order. The application for enforcement shall be given precedence over other cases pending in court and shall in every way be expedited.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 1; 2001, ch. 73, § 1.

§ 13-10-205.
Removal of officer or director; notice; opportunity for hearing.

After notice and opportunity for hearing, the commissioner may issue a final order removing an officer or director of a Wyoming financial institution or a bank holding company if the officer or director:

Has violated any state statute or rule relating to financial institutions in performing the duties of his office;

Has engaged or participated in any unsafe and unsound practice in performing the duties of his office; or

Has been convicted of or has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a crime involving dishonesty or breach of trust.

Before issuing a final removal order, the commissioner shall serve notice of intent to issue the order upon the officer or director. The notice shall be in writing and shall contain the information required by W.S. 13-10-208(a).

The officer or director may request a hearing on the proposed order before the board in accordance with W.S. 13-10-208(b). If the officer or director does not request a hearing in writing within the prescribed time period, the proposed order shall become a final removal order and the commissioner shall serve the final order upon the officer or director.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 1; 2003, ch. 16, § 1.

No hearing absent order issued by regulators. —

Former similar provision explicitly provided the opportunity for a hearing in conjunction with an order that was issued pursuant to that statute. Since the bank regulators never issued such an order, the hearing requirements never came into play. Lenz v. Dewey, 64 F.3d 547, 1995 U.S. App. LEXIS 24140 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1995).

§ 13-10-206.
Temporary suspension order; stay of order; enforcement.

If the commissioner believes the actions of the officer or director pose an immediate threat to the safety and soundness of a Wyoming financial institution or to the interests of the depositors, creditors or shareholders of the financial institution, the commissioner may suspend the officer or director pending final action on the proposed removal order issued pursuant to W.S.

13-10-205

. The temporary suspension order shall be in writing and shall be served upon the officer or director together with the notice of intent to issue a removal order as provided in W.S.

13-10-205

(b). The temporary order shall take effect upon service. The officer or director may apply to the district court for the county in which the Wyoming financial institution is located for a stay of the temporary suspension order. The application for stay shall be given precedence over other cases pending in court and shall in every way be expedited. The court shall grant the stay only if the officer or director shows he will be irreparably harmed unless the stay issues and there is a substantial likelihood he will prevail on the merits. The temporary suspension order shall remain in effect until the commissioner issues the final removal order, the board dismisses the proposed removal order or the court stays enforcement of the temporary suspension order.

On or after the effective date of a temporary suspension order issued pursuant to this section, the attorney general, upon request from the commissioner, may apply to the district court for the county in which the Wyoming financial institution is located for enforcement of the temporary suspension order. The application for enforcement shall be given precedence over other cases pending in court and shall in every way be expedited.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 1.

§ 13-10-207.
Civil penalties; amount; factors; notice; payment.

In addition to other administrative or criminal remedies authorized in this act, the commissioner, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may assess a civil penalty against a Wyoming financial institution, an officer or director of a Wyoming financial institution or a bank holding company if the Wyoming financial institution, officer or director or bank holding company:

Is found to have violated any state statute or rule relating to financial institutions or to have engaged in any unsafe and unsound practice, whether willfully or as a result of negligence, incompetence or recklessness; or

Is found to have violated or failed to comply with any provision of a lawful order issued by the commissioner pursuant to this act.

The civil penalty for violating state statute or rule relating to financial institutions or engaging in an unsafe and unsound practice shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) per violation. The civil penalty for violating or failing to comply with a lawful order of the commissioner shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) per day for each day of the violation or noncompliance.

In determining the amount of the civil penalty to be assessed, the commissioner shall consider:

The seriousness of the violation or the unsafe and unsound practice;

The good faith of the Wyoming financial institution, officer or director or the bank holding company;

The history of previous violations or unsafe and unsound practices by the Wyoming financial institution, officer or director or the bank holding company;

The financial resources of the Wyoming financial institution, officer or director or the bank holding company; and

Any other matters the commissioner deems appropriate.

Before issuing a final order imposing a penalty, the commissioner shall serve notice of intent to issue the order upon the Wyoming financial institution, officer or director or the bank holding company to be assessed. The notice shall be in writing and shall contain the information required by W.S. 13-10-208(a), the amount of the civil penalty for each violation and the total amount of the civil penalty to be assessed.

The Wyoming financial institution, officer or director or the bank holding company may request a hearing on the proposed order before the board in accordance with W.S. 13-10-208(b). If the Wyoming financial institution, officer or director or the bank holding company does not request a hearing in writing within the prescribed time period, the proposed order of assessment shall become a final order of assessment and the commissioner shall serve the final order of assessment upon the Wyoming financial institution, officer or director or the bank holding company.

The Wyoming financial institution, officer or director or the bank holding company shall pay the civil penalty assessed by a final order in full to the commissioner within thirty (30) days of receipt of the final order of assessment. Any civil penalty received under this section shall be deposited into the county public school fund of the county in which the violation occurred. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no Wyoming financial institution or bank holding company shall indemnify or insure any officer or director of a Wyoming financial institution against civil penalties assessed under this section.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

§ 13-10-208.
Procedures for enforcement actions; service of notice; content of orders; contested case proceedings; appeal.

All notices and orders required to be served by the commissioner under this article shall be served by certified mail return receipt requested to the last known address of the Wyoming financial institution, the bank holding company or officer or director who is the subject of the order or shall be served as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure. Notice of a proposed order issued by the commissioner under this article shall include:

A statement of the grounds for issuing the proposed order, including a citation to the statute or rule involved, if any;

A statement of the facts in support of the allegations;

A statement informing the Wyoming financial institution, the bank holding company or officer or director subject to the proposed order of the right to a hearing on the order before the state banking board and that failure to timely request a hearing will result in the order becoming final; and

A copy of the proposed order.

A request for hearing on a proposed order issued by the commissioner under this article shall be in writing and shall be submitted to the commissioner no later than seven (7) days after receipt of the notice of intent from the commissioner. The board shall hold the hearing no later than fifteen (15) days after receipt of the request for hearing, unless the Wyoming financial institution, the bank holding company or officer or director subject to the proposed order requests an extension of time for good cause shown.

A hearing on a proposed order issued under this article shall be a contested case hearing conducted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. After the hearing, the board shall issue findings of fact and conclusions of law and a final decision either confirming or dismissing a proposed order. The board shall confirm a proposed order only if the board finds by a preponderance of the evidence that grounds exist under this article for issuing the order. Otherwise, the board shall dismiss the proposed order. In confirming a proposed order imposing a civil penalty, the board may modify the amount of the penalty assessed after considering the factors in W.S. 13-10-207(c). If the board confirms a proposed order it shall become a final order.

The commissioner shall serve a final order under this article upon the Wyoming financial institution, the bank holding company and officer or director who is the subject of the order. The final order shall take effect upon service and shall remain in effect until the commissioner or the court terminates the final order. The Wyoming financial institution, the bank holding company or officer or director who is the subject of the order may appeal the issuance of a final order in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

On or after the effective date of a final order under this article, the attorney general, upon request from the commissioner, may apply to the district court of the county in which the Wyoming financial institution or the bank holding company is located for enforcement of the final order. The application for enforcement shall be given precedence over other cases pending in court and shall in every way be expedited.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 1.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 13-10-209.
Prompt corrective action; definition.

In addition to the other administrative enforcement actions authorized in this act, the commissioner shall take prompt corrective action against a Wyoming financial institution as necessary to protect the safety and soundness of the Wyoming financial institution in the event the financial institution becomes critically undercapitalized. For purposes of this section, “Wyoming financial institution” does not include trust companies.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).